North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-22 Improvements by Special Assessment Method
40-22-28.
Determination of kind of paving after bids are considered.

If the contemplated improvement consists of paving or repaving, the governing body, after it has opened and considered the bids, shall determine by resolution the kind or kinds of pavement to be laid, and thereafter may proceed to award the necessary contract or contracts.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 73, art. 16, § 4; 1893, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 2318; S.L. 1899, ch. 41, § 4; R.C. 1899, §§ 2318, 2326d; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 148; R.C. 1905, § 2783; S.L. 1907, ch. 46, § 7; 1913, ch. 70, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3708; R.C. 1943, § 40-2228.

40-22-29.
Engineer’s statement of estimated cost required — Governing body to enter into contracts.

Before adopting or rejecting any bid filed under the provisions of this chapter, the governing body shall require the engineer for the municipality to make a careful and detailed statement of the estimated cost of the work for which proposals were advertised under section 40-22-19. The governing body may not award the contract to any bidder if the engineer’s estimate prepared pursuant to this section exceeds the engineer’s estimate of the cost of the work prepared pursuant to subsection 1 of section 40-22-10 by forty percent or more.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 73, art. 16, § 4; 1893, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 2318; S.L. 1899, ch. 41, § 4; R.C. 1899, §§ 2318, 2326d; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 148; R.C. 1905, § 2783; S.L. 1907, ch. 46, § 7; 1913, ch. 70, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3708; R.C. 1943, § 40-2229; S.L. 1985, ch. 459, § 1; 1995, ch. 443, § 7; 2003, ch. 345, § 2.

40-22-30.
Contractor’s bond — Execution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 443, § 29.

40-22-31.
Conditions of contractor’s bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 443, § 29.

40-22-32.
Approval of bonds — Return of bidder’s bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 443, § 29.

40-22-33.
Failure to execute contractor’s bond. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 443, § 29.

40-22-34.
Insufficiency of bonds — New bonds required — Failure to furnish. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 443, § 29.

40-22-35.
Execution and filing of contract.

All contracts entered into for any work provided for in this chapter shall be entered into in the name of the municipality and shall be executed on the part of the municipality by the executive officer and countersigned by the auditor. After the contract is signed by the contractor, it shall be filed in the office of the city auditor.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 73, art. 16, § 4; 1893, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 2318; S.L. 1899, ch. 41, § 4; R.C. 1899, §§ 2318, 2326d; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 149; R.C. 1905, § 2784; C.L. 1913, § 3709; R.C. 1943, § 40-2235; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 150; 1973, ch. 80, § 15.

Collateral References.

Revocation, prior to execution of formal written contract, of vote or decision of public body awarding contract to bidder, 3 A.L.R.3d 864.

40-22-36.
Contracts — Conditions and terms.

A contract let under the provisions of this chapter shall require the work to be done pursuant to the plans and specifications on file in the office of the city auditor, subject to the approval of the engineer acting for the municipality, and shall provide further:

That the governing body shall have the right to suspend the work at any time for improper construction and to relet the contract therefor or to order a reconstruction of the work as to any part thereof improperly done.

The time within which the work shall be completed.

The period of time for which the work shall be guaranteed as to workmanship and materials.

The fund from which the contract price is to be paid by the municipality.

That the consideration expressed in the contract is payable only in warrants drawn on the fund described in the contract.

That the municipality assumes and incurs no general liability under such contract.

That failure of the engineer to reject work and materials which are not up to specifications and acceptance of the job by the engineer shall not release the contractor from liability for any failure on the contractor’s part to perform work or furnish materials in accordance with the plans and specifications.

The engineer acting for the municipality shall supervise and inspect the work during its progress. In addition to any rights which a municipality may have under its contract for construction of part or all of an improvement after a contract has been awarded and before work thereunder has been completed a municipality may, with the consent of the contractor and without advertising for bids, order additional work done by that contractor of the same character as that which was contracted for, whether within or without the improvement district for which the original contract was made, and upon the same terms and conditions specified in the original contract except as to time of performance, and at the same prices for the additional work provided that the total price payable to the contractor for such additional work shall not exceed twenty percent of the amount estimated by the engineer for the municipality to be payable for that character of work under the original contract.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 73, art. 16, § 4; 1893, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 2318; S.L. 1899, ch. 41, § 4; R.C. 1899, §§ 2318, 2326d; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 149; R.C. 1905, § 2784; C.L. 1913, § 3709; R.C. 1943, § 40-2236; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 151; 1971, ch. 402, § 7.

40-22-37.
Contractor shall be paid during progress of work — Retainage — Failure to pay — Rate of interest — Investment of retainage.

If the contractor to whom a contract is let properly performs the work therein designated, the governing body, at least once in each calendar month during the continuance of such contract work, shall meet, receive, and consider estimates furnished by the agent, engineer, or architect acting for the municipality or if not so furnished, then by the contractor, and shall allow such estimates in an amount of the estimated value of the labor and material furnished upon such contract, and of the material then upon the ground for use in such contract, subject to retentions equal to ten percent of each estimate presented until such time as the project is fifty percent completed, with no further retainage on estimates during the continuance of the contract. The governing body may, however, upon completion of ninety-five percent of the contract according to the estimates, pay to the contractor ninety-five percent of the amount retained from previous estimates. Any amount retained after ninety-five percent completion of the contract shall be paid to the contractor in such amounts and at such times as are approved by the municipality, upon estimates by its agent, engineer, or architect or the contractor, with final payment of all moneys due to the contractor to be made immediately following completion and acceptance of the project. The governing body, immediately after considering and allowing any such estimate, shall certify and forward the same to the city auditor or other official having the power to draw warrants, who forthwith shall draw a warrant upon the proper fund and transmit the same promptly to the contractor entitled thereto. In case the governing body shall fail or neglect to receive and allow such estimate or certify any estimate or final payment upon completion and acceptance or the proper officer required to issue such warrant shall fail or neglect to issue a warrant as provided herein, for a period of more than thirty days from the date of such estimate or completion date, then said estimate or final payment, together with any retainage properly payable, shall draw interest from its date at the rate per annum of two percentage points below the Bank of North Dakota prime interest rate as set thirty days from the date of such estimate or completion date until the issuance of a proper warrant therefor. Such interest shall be computed and added to the face of said estimate, final payment, or retainage by the officer required to issue such warrant, shall be included in the warrant when drawn, and shall be charged to the fund from which payment for the improvement is to be made. On the amounts of estimates retained, as provided herein, the governing board, authorized committee, or public body in charge of such work may invest or deposit the retained amounts in any financial association or institution in North Dakota earning interest or dividends for the benefit of the contractor. Any amounts so invested or deposited shall remain in the name of the governing board, authorized committee, or public body in charge of such work until final payment of all money due to the contractor is to be made. Further, no contractor shall use such account in any manner whatsoever until released and received by the contractor upon completion of the contract.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 73, art. 16, § 5; 1893, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 2319; S.L. 1899, ch. 41, § 5; R.C. 1899, §§ 2319, 2326e; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 150; R.C. 1905, § 2785; C.L. 1913, § 3710; R.C. 1943, § 40-2237; S.L. 1963, ch. 295, § 1; 1971, ch. 405, § 1; 1975, ch. 376, § 1; 1981, ch. 467, § 1.

Partial Awards.

Partial awards during the progress of work are limited to eighty-five percent of the amount of the estimates shown to have been earned. State ex rel. Kistler v. Hankinson, 53 N.D. 346, 205 N.W. 995, 1925 N.D. LEXIS 87 (N.D. 1925). (Decided prior to 1963 amendment which changed percentages).

40-22-38.
Application of chapter to waterworks and water mains — Acquisition of waterworks, sewage treatment and disposal plants, and sewer systems.

The provisions of this chapter relating to water mains and waterworks apply only to municipalities that own or contemplate owning a system of waterworks and water mains. In case of the purchase of a waterworks system or of a sewage treatment or disposal plant or of a system of sewers, either by eminent domain proceedings subject to chapter 32-15, or otherwise, a municipality may create improvement districts, direct the preparation of plans and specifications, adopt a resolution declaring the purchase of such facilities necessary, and take all other proceedings prescribed by this chapter which would be taken in case of the construction of such facilities by the municipality itself for the purpose of defraying the cost thereof by special assessment of the property benefited thereby. The property benefited may be specially assessed for the purchase of such facilities, either separately or as a part of a new system, the same as if said facilities were constructed entirely anew.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 179; R.C. 1905, § 2817; C.L. 1913, § 3742; S.L. 1921, ch. 36, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3742; R.C. 1943, § 40-2238; S.L. 1951, ch. 267, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 40-2238; 2007, ch. 293, § 21.

Cross-References.

Community water facility loans, see ch. 6-09.5.

40-22-39.
Abbreviations, letters, or figures may be used in proceedings for levy and collection of special assessments.

In all proceedings for the levy and collection of special assessments, abbreviations, letters, and figures may be used to denote additions, lots, lands, blocks, sections, townships, ranges, and parts thereof, years, days of the month, and amounts of money.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 41, § 16; 1899, ch. 41, § 17; R.C. 1899, §§ 2326q, 2327i; S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 176; R.C. 1905, § 2814; C.L. 1913, § 3739; R.C. 1943, § 40-2239.

40-22-40.
City auditor to keep complete record of improvements — Record as evidence.

The city auditor shall keep in the city auditor’s office a complete record of all the proceedings taken in the matter of making any improvements under this chapter. Such record shall include all reports and the confirmations thereof, all petitions, orders, appointments of commissioners, notices and proofs of publications, and resolutions of the governing body. Such record, a certified transcript thereof, or the original papers, proofs of publications, orders, or resolutions on file in such office shall be admitted in evidence in any court or place in this state without further proof as evidence of the facts therein contained.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 62, § 175; R.C. 1905, § 2813; C.L. 1913, § 3738; R.C. 1943, § 40-2240; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 152.

40-22-41.
Validation. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

40-22-42.
Confirmation of certain proceedings for city and village improvements. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

40-22-43.
Defects and irregularities in improvement proceedings are not fatal.

Defects and irregularities in any proceedings had or to be had under this chapter relating to municipal improvements by the special assessment method, when the proceedings are for a lawful purpose and are unaffected by fraud and do not violate any constitutional limitation or restriction, shall not invalidate such proceedings, and no action shall be commenced or maintained and no defense or counterclaim in any action shall be recognized in the courts of this state founded on any such defects or irregularities in such proceedings, unless commenced within thirty days of the adoption of the resolution of the governing board awarding the sale of warrants to finance the improvement.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 305, § 1; 1977, ch. 216, § 2.

40-22-44.
Discontinuance of municipal parking lots.

The governing body of a municipality may, if it deems it in the best interests of the municipality, discontinue the operation of a municipal parking lot when there exists a higher and better use for the property. If any portion of the cost of such parking lot has been paid for by special assessment, the governing body shall, prior to making any determination to discontinue, hold a public hearing concerning the continuance or discontinuance of such parking lot. The governing body shall cause to be published once each week for two consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the municipality a notice of the time when and the place where the governing body will meet to conduct the hearing required by this section. If the governing body, after public hearing, determines that the parking lot may be put to a higher and better use, the governing body is hereby authorized to take the necessary steps to effectuate that use. For this purpose, the governing body is authorized to, but not limited to, enter into and complete negotiations for the sale of the parking lot in question.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 331, § 1.

40-22-45.
Equalization of original assessment.

Whenever any portion of the cost of a parking lot which is to be discontinued has been paid for by special assessment, the useful life of the parking lot shall be determined by the governing body. If the period of time determined to be the useful life of the parking lot has not completely elapsed, the governing body of the municipality shall direct the cancellation of uncollected installments of special assessments previously levied for the same improvement, and the refund of installments paid, plus interest calculated at four and one-half percent per annum on the refunded prepaid installments, from the general fund of the municipality to the extent determined by it to be necessary to make the original assessments and the subsequent assessments bear as nearly as possible the same relation to the total benefits derived from the improvement by the respective properties assessed.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 331, § 2.

40-22-46.
Payment of outstanding warrants — Deposits of surplus in general fund — General fund liable for any outstanding warrants.

Upon the discontinuance of any municipal parking lot under the authority of sections 40-22-44 and 40-22-45, the governing body shall apply the proceeds from the sale of such property, if such property is sold, to the special assessment fund created to bear the cost of creating the parking lot. If there is any surplus after all of the outstanding special assessment warrants or bonds are redeemed, the surplus shall be transferred to the general fund of the municipality. If the proceeds from the sale of such property, if such property is sold, are insufficient to cover the cost of redeeming the outstanding special assessment warrants or bonds, the governing body shall provide for the payment of said warrants or bonds out of the general fund of the municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 331, § 3.